src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-3-kîskiswîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 3Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-wî-kîskisotwâw, î-wî-kîskisocik] # as they are going to play me
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisoskwâw # as they are going to play you
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyâhkwâw # as they are going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskisoyamihcik # as they are going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyahkwâw # as they are going to play you and us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskisotahkwâw # as they are going to play you and us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyîkwâw # as they are going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-wî-kîskisotîkwâw # as they are going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskiswâcik # as they are going to play another/others
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomâcik # as they are going to play yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-wî-kîskisomit # as another/others are going to play me
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisomisk # as another/others are going to play you
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wî-kîskisokot # as another/others are going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyâhk # as another/others are going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyahk # as another/others are going to play you and us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyîk # as another/others are going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-wî-kîskisokocik # as another/others are going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskiswâthit # as another/others are going to play yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisokothit # as yet another/others are going to play another/others

      # X
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-wî-kîskisokawiyân # as someone is going to play me
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisokawiyan # as someone is going to play you
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-wî-kîskisoht # as someone is going to play him/her
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisokawiyâhk # as someone is going to play us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-wî-kîskisokawiyahk # as someone is going to play you and us
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisokawiyîk # as someone is going to play you all
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-wî-kîskisohcik # as someone is going to play them
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisomiht # as someone is going to play another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-wî-kîskisokoyân
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-wî-kîskisokoyan
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wî-kîskisokot
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-wî-kîskisokoyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-wî-kîskisokocik
      PV/î+PV/wi+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-kîskisokothit
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kika-kîskisotin # I will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nika-kîskiswâw # I will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kika-kîskisotinâwâw # I will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nika-kîskiswâwak # I will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nika-kîskisomâwa # I will play another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kika-kîskison # you will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kika-kîskiswâw # you will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kika-kîskisonân # you will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kika-kîskiswâwak # you will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kika-kîskisomâwa # you will play another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kika-kîskison # you will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kika-kîskisok # he/she will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kika-kîskisonân # you will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kika-kîskisokonaw # he/she will play you and us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kika-kîskisokowâw # he/she will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kika-kîskiswâwak # you will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kika-kîskisomâwa # you will play another/others
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomîw # he/she will play yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kika-kîskisotinân # we will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nika-kîskiswânân # we will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kika-kîskisotinân # we will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nika-kîskiswânânak # we will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nika-kîskisomânâna # we will play another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kika-kîskiswânaw # we and you will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kika-kîskiswânawak # we and you will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kika-kîskisomânawa # we and you will play another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kika-kîskisonâwâw # you all will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kika-kîskiswâwâw # you all will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kika-kîskisonân # you all will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kika-kîskiswâwâwak # you all will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kika-kîskisomâwâwa # you all will play another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nika-kîskisokwak # they will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kika-kîskisokwak # they will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nika-kîskisokonânak # they will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kika-kîskisokonawak # they will play you and us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kika-kîskisokowâwak # they will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskiswîwak # they will play another/others
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomîwak # they will play yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-kîskisokothiwa # another/others will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-kîskisokothiwa # another/others will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ka-kîskisokow, ka-kîskisok] # another/others will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-kîskisokonâna # another/others will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-kîskisokonawa # another/others will play you and us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-kîskisokowâwa # another/others will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ka-kîskisokowak, ka-kîskisokwak] # another/others will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-kîskiswîthiwa # another/others will play yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisokothiwa # yet another/others will play another/others

      # X
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nika-kîskisokawin # someone will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kika-kîskisokawin # someone will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: ka-kîskiswâw # someone will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nika-kîskisokawinân # someone will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kika-kîskisokawinaw, kika-kîskisokawinânaw] # someone will play you and us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kika-kîskisokawinâwâw # someone will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: ka-kîskiswâwak # someone will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskiswâthiwa # someone will play another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-kîskisokon
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-kîskisokon
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-kîskisokow
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-kîskisokonân
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-kîskisokonaw
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-kîskisokowâw
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-kîskisokowak
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisokothiwa
      

      # Inf # PV/ka

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ka-kîskisotân # I will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ka-kîskiswak # I will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ka-kîskisotakwâw # I will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ka-kîskiswakwâw # I will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ka-kîskiswaki # I will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomak # I will play another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-kîskisoyan # you will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ka-kîskiswat # you will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-kîskisoyâhk # you will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-kîskiswacik # you will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomat # you will play another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-kîskisoyan # you will play me
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ka-kîskisosk # he/she will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-kîskisoyâhk # you will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ka-kîskisokoyâhk # he/she will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ka-kîskisoyamiht # he/she will play us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ka-kîskisokoyahk # he/she will play you and us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ka-kîskisotahk # he/she will play you and us
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ka-kîskisokoyîk # he/she will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ka-kîskisotîk # he/she will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-kîskiswacik # you will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomat # you will play another/others
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomât # he/she will play yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ka-kîskisotâhk # we will play you
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ka-kîskiswâyâhk # we will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-kîskiswakiht # we will play him/her
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ka-kîskisotâhk # we will play you all
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ka-kîskiswâyâhkwâw # we will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-kîskiswakihcik # we will play them
      PV/ka+kîskiswîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-kîskisomâyâhk # we will play another/others
